Utah statutes.
70D-3-103.   General powers and duties of commissioner.
Subject to this chapter:
(1)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commissioner may make rules authorized by this chapter, including:
(a)  providing for an interim procedure for:
(i)  licensing; and
(ii)  acceptance of an application; and
(b)  coordination between filings required under this chapter and:
(i)  Title 70C, Utah Consumer Credit Code; or
(ii)  Chapter 2, Mortgage Lending and Servicing Act.
(2)  The commissioner may enter into a relationship or contract with the
nationwide database or another entity designated by the nationwide database to
do the following related to a licensee or other person subject to this
chapter:
(a)  collect or maintain a record; and
(b)  process a transaction fee or other fee.
(3)  The commissioner shall regularly report the following to the nationwide
database:
(a)  a violation of this chapter;
(b)  disciplinary action under Section 70D-3-501; and
(c)  other information relevant to this chapter.
